Mississippi, session 2026, SB2585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Sections 1 through 6 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the "In-Person Early Voting Act." SECTION 2. For purposes of this act, these words will have the following meanings, unless their context clearly suggests otherwise: (a) "Election" means the period of time that is available for casting a final vote.  References to the time of an election or the duration of the election shall encompass, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the fifteen-day period that has been designed for in-person early voting. (b)  "Polling place" or "voting precinct" means any place where a qualified elector votes during the in-person early voting period and on the actual election day. SECTION 3. (1)  The in-person early voting period shall begin fifteen (15) days before the date of each primary, general, runoff, special and municipal election for public office and continue until 12:00 p.m. on the Saturday immediately preceding the election day.  Any qualified elector may vote during the times established for in-person early voting in this chapter only in the office of the registrar in which the elector is registered to vote.  No other or additional location for in-person early voting is permitted. (2)  In-person early voting shall be conducted in the office of the appropriate registrar during regular business hours.  During the last full week preceding an election, the office of the appropriate registrar may extend the office hours to accommodate in-person early voters to allow voting during the lunch period and until 7:00 p.m.  All registrar offices shall remain open from 8:00 a.m. until 12:00 p.m. for the two (2) Saturdays immediately preceding each election. (3)  Notice of the in-person early voting hours shall be given by the officials in charge of the election not less than eight (8) days before the in-person early voting period begins. Such notice shall be posted in three (3) public places within the county or municipality, with one (1) place being the county courthouse in a county election or city hall in a municipal election. SECTION 4. (1)  A qualified elector who desires to vote during the in-person early voting period shall appear at the office of the appropriate registrar in the county or municipality in which the elector is a resident and registered to vote and shall present an acceptable form of photo identification.  Upon verification of the proper location and identity, the elector shall be marked in the Statewide Elections Management System as "VOTED IPE," sign the appropriate receipt book and cast his or her vote in the same manner that such vote would be cast on the day of the election.  Except as otherwise provided in Sections 1 through 6 of this act, the election laws that govern the procedures for a person who appears to vote on the day of an election shall apply when a person appears to vote during the in-person early voting period. (2)  All votes cast during the in-person early voting period shall be final. (3)  The votes cast during the in-person early voting period shall be tabulated and announced simultaneously with all other votes cast on election day after the polls close at 7:00 p.m., and not before that time. SECTION 5.  Each political party, candidate or any representative of a political party or candidate pursuant to Section 23-15-577 shall have the right to be present at the office of the appropriate registrar when it is open for in-person early voting and to challenge the qualifications of any person offering to vote in the same manner as provided by law for challenging qualifications at the polling place on election day. SECTION 6. (1)  The Secretary of State shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effectuate in-person early voting. (2)  The Secretary of State shall promulgate specific instructions for the security and integrity of the voting systems during the in-person early voting period.  All voting systems used under this section shall be maintained and locked in a secure location at the registrar's office or building each day after the close of in-person early voting hours. SECTION 7. (1)  As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings, unless the context clearly provides otherwise: (a)  "Ballot harvesting" means a person who knowingly collects and transmits a ballot belonging to another person outside of the exceptions provided in Section 2315-907. (b)  "Ballot drop boxes" means an unsupervised receptacle where voters can return absentee or mail ballots in sealed and signed envelopes.  Ballot drop boxes shall also include supervised drop-box locations that are not voting locations authorized by state law. (2)  Voting via ballot harvesting, ballot drop boxes, or by mail-in or absentee ballots other than for reasons or instances allowed by the Mississippi Election Code, shall be prohibited. SECTION 8.  Section 23-15-625, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-625.  (1)  The registrar shall be responsible for providing applications for absentee voting as provided in this section.  At least sixty (60) days before any election in which absentee voting is provided for by law, the registrar shall provide a sufficient number of applications.  In the event a special election is called and set at a date which makes it impractical or impossible to prepare applications for absent elector's ballot sixty (60) days before the election, the registrar shall provide applications as soon as practicable after the election is called.  The registrar shall fill in the date of the particular election on the application for which the application will be used. For voters appearing in person to cast an absentee vote, the application and elector certificate shall be printed on the absentee ballot envelope as provided in Section 23-15-659. (2)  The registrar shall be authorized to disburse applications for absentee ballots to any qualified elector within the county where he or she serves.  Any person who presents to the registrar an oral or written request for an absentee ballot application for a voter entitled to vote absentee by mail, other than the elector who seeks to vote by absentee ballot, shall, in the presence of the registrar, sign the application and print on the application his or her name and address and the name of the elector for whom the application is being requested in the place provided for on the application for that purpose. However, if for any reason such person is unable to write the information required, then the registrar shall write the information on a printed form which has been prescribed by the Secretary of State.  The form shall provide a place for such person to place his or her mark after the form has been filled out by the registrar. (3)  It shall be unlawful for any person to solicit absentee ballot applications or absentee ballots for persons staying in any skilled nursing facility as defined in Section 41-7-173 unless the person soliciting the absentee ballot applications or absentee ballots is: (a)  A family member of the person staying in the skilled nursing facility; or (b)  A person designated by the person for whom the absentee ballot application or absentee ballot is sought, the registrar or the deputy registrar. As used in this subsection, "family member" means a spouse, parent, grandparent, sibling, adult child, grandchild or legal guardian. (4)  The registrar in the county wherein a voter is qualified to vote upon receiving by mail the envelope containing the absentee ballots shall keep an accurate list of all persons preparing such ballots.  The list shall be kept in a conspicuous place accessible to the public near the entrance to the registrar's office.  The registrar shall also furnish to each * * * precinct poll manager a list of the names of all persons in each respective precinct voting absentee by mail and during in-person early voting to be posted in a conspicuous place at the polling place for public notice.  The application on file with the registrar and the envelopes containing the ballots that voters mailed to the registrar shall be kept by the registrar in his or her office in a secure location.  At the time such boxes are delivered to the election commissioners or poll managers, the registrar shall also turn over a list of all such persons who have voted during in-person early voting and whose mailed ballots are in the registrar's office. (5)  The registrar shall also be authorized to mail one (1) application to any qualified elector of the county, who is eligible to vote by absentee ballot, for use in a particular election. (6)  The registrar shall process all applications for absentee ballots by using the Statewide Election Management System.  The registrar shall account for all absentee ballots delivered to and received by mail as well as those who voted absentee in person from qualified voters by processing such ballots using the Statewide Election Management System. SECTION 9.  Section 23-15-627, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-627.  (1)  Any elector described in Section 23-15-713 may request an absentee ballot application and * * * vote in person at the office of the registrar in the county in which he or she resides have the application and absentee ballot mailed to the elector.  The registrar shall be responsible for furnishing an absentee ballot application form to any elector authorized to receive an absentee ballot.  Such form shall be printed on the absentee ballot envelope as provided in Section 23-15-659.  Except as otherwise provided in Section 23-15-625, absentee ballot applications shall be furnished to a person only upon the oral or written request of the elector who seeks to vote by absentee ballot; however, the parent, child, spouse, sibling, legal guardian, those empowered with a power of attorney for that elector's affairs or agent of the elector, who is designated in writing and witnessed by a resident of this state who shall write his or her physical address on such designation, may orally request an absentee ballot application on behalf of the elector.  The written designation shall be valid for one (1) year after the date of the designation.  An absentee ballot application must have the seal of the circuit or municipal clerk affixed to it and be initialed by the registrar or his or her deputy in order to be used to obtain an absentee ballot.  A reproduction of an absentee ballot application shall not be valid unless it is a reproduction provided by the office of the registrar of the jurisdiction in which the election is being held and which contains the seal and initials required by this section. (2)  Such application shall be substantially in the following form for applications mailed to absentee electors: "OFFICIAL APPLICATION FOR ABSENT ELECTOR'S BALLOT I, _____, duly qualified and registered in the ___ Precinct of the County of _____, and State of Mississippi, coming within the purview of the definition 'ABSENT ELECTOR' will be absent from the county of my residence on election day, or unable to vote in person because (check appropriate reason): ( )  (PRESIDENTIAL APPLICANT ONLY:)  I am currently a resident of Mississippi or have moved therefrom within thirty (30) days of the coming presidential election. ( )  I am an enlisted or commissioned member, male or female, of any component of the United States Armed Forces and am a citizen of Mississippi, or spouse or dependent of such member. ( )  I am a member of the Merchant Marine or the American Red Cross and am a citizen of Mississippi or spouse or dependent of such member. ( )  I am a disabled war veteran who is a patient in any hospital and am a citizen of Mississippi or spouse or dependent of such veteran. ( )  I am a civilian attached to and serving outside of the United States with any branch of the Armed Forces or with the Merchant Marine or American Red Cross, and am a citizen of Mississippi or spouse or dependent of such civilian. ( )  I am a citizen of Mississippi temporarily residing outside the territorial limits of the United States and the District of Columbia. * * * ( )  I am a student, teacher or administrator at a college, university, junior or community college, high, junior high, elementary or grade school, whose studies or employment at such institution necessitates my absence from the county of my voting residence or spouse or dependent of such student, teacher or administrator who maintains a common domicile outside the county of my voting residence with such student, teacher or administrator. ( )  I am a citizen of Mississippi temporarily residing outside of the county of my residence during the in-person early voting period or on election day. ( )  I am an emergency response provider, deployed due to a state of emergency declared by the President of the United States or the governor of any state within the United States during the time period provided by state law for in-person early voting and election day. * * * ( )  I will be outside the county on election day. ( )  I have a temporary or permanent physical disability. ( )  I am sixty-five (65) years of age or older. ( )  I am the parent, spouse or dependent of a person with a temporary or permanent physical disability who is hospitalized outside his or her county of residence or more than fifty (50) miles away from his or her residence, and I will be with such person on election day. ( )  I am a member of the congressional delegation, or spouse or dependent of a member of the congressional delegation. * * * ( )  I am required to be at work on election day during the times when the polls will be open or I am required to be on‑call on election day during the times when the polls will be open. ( )  I am incarcerated in prison or jail in the county where I am registered to vote and have not been convicted of a disenfranchising crime. I hereby make application for an official ballot, or ballots, to be voted by me at the election to be held in _____, on _____. Mail 'Absent Elector's Ballot' to me at the following address ____________. ( )  I wish to receive an absentee ballot for the runoff election ___________________________________________. Notify me of a problem with my 'Absent Elector's Ballot' at the following: Phone number: _____________________________ Email address: ____________________________ Mailing address: __________________________ I realize that I can be fined up to Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and sentenced up to five (5) years in the Penitentiary for making a false statement in this application and for selling my vote and violating the Mississippi Absentee Voter Law.  (This sentence is to be in bold print.) If you are temporarily or permanently disabled, you are not required to have this application notarized or signed by an official authorized to administer oaths for absentee balloting.  You are required to sign this application in the proper place and have a person eighteen (18) years of age or older witness your signature and sign this application in the proper place. DO NOT SIGN WITHOUT READING.  (This sentence is to be in bold print.) IN WITNESS WHEREOF I have hereunto set my hand and seal this the ____ day of ______, 2___. ______________________________________ (Signature of absent elector) SWORN TO AND SUBSCRIBED before me this the ____ day of _____, 2___. ________________________________________ (Official authorized to administer oaths for absentee balloting.) TO BE SIGNED BY WITNESS FOR VOTERS TEMPORARILY OR PERMANENTLY DISABLED: I HEREBY CERTIFY that this application for an absent elector's ballot was signed by the above-named elector in my presence and that I am at least eighteen (18) years of age, this the _____ day of ____________________, 2___. _________________________________ (Signature of witness) CERTIFICATE OF DELIVERY I hereby certify that _________________ (print name of voter) has requested that I, __________________ (print name of person delivering application), deliver to the voter this absentee ballot application. __________________________________________ (Signature of person delivering application) __________________________________________ (Address of person delivering application)" (3)  The application printed on the front of the absentee ballot envelope for absentee voters appearing before the registrar shall be substantially in the following form: "OFFICIAL APPLICATION FOR ABSENT ELECTOR'S BALLOT I, _____, duly qualified and registered in the ___ Precinct of the County of _____, and State of Mississippi, coming within the purview of the definition 'ABSENT ELECTOR' will be absent from the county of my residence on election day, or unable to vote in person because (check appropriate reason): ( )  (PRESIDENTIAL APPLICANT ONLY:)  I am currently a resident of Mississippi or have moved therefrom within thirty (30) days of the coming presidential election. ( )  I am an enlisted or commissioned member, male or female, of any component of the United States Armed Forces and am a citizen of Mississippi, or spouse or dependent of such member. ( )  I am a member of the Merchant Marine or the American Red Cross and am a citizen of Mississippi or spouse or dependent of such member. ( )  I am a disabled war veteran who is a patient in any hospital and am a citizen of Mississippi or spouse or dependent of such veteran. ( )  I am a civilian attached to and serving outside of the United States with any branch of the Armed Forces or with the Merchant Marine or American Red Cross, and am a citizen of Mississippi or spouse or dependent of such civilian. ( )  I am a citizen of Mississippi temporarily residing outside the territorial limits of the United States and the District of Columbia. * * * ( )  I am a student, teacher or administrator at a college, university, junior or community college, high, junior high, elementary or grade school, whose studies or employment at such institution necessitates my absence from the county of my voting residence or spouse or dependent of such student, teacher or administrator who maintains a common domicile outside the county of my voting residence with such student, teacher or administrator. ( )  I am a citizen of Mississippi temporarily residing outside of the county of my residence during the in-person early voting period or on election day. ( )  I am an emergency first-response provider, deployed due to a state of emergency declared by the President of the United States or the governor of any state within the United States during the time period provided by law for in-person early voting and election day. * * * ( )  I will be outside the county on election day. ( )  I have a temporary or permanent physical disability. ( )  I am sixty-five (65) years of age or older. ( )  I am the parent, spouse or dependent of a person with a temporary or permanent physical disability who is hospitalized outside his or her county of residence or more than fifty (50) miles away from his or her residence, and I will be with such person on election day. ( )  I am a member of the congressional delegation, or spouse or dependent of a member of the congressional delegation. * * * ( )  I am required to be at work on election day during the times when the polls will be open or I am required to be on‑call on election day during the times when the polls will be open. ( )  I am incarcerated in prison or jail in the county where I am registered to vote and have not been convicted of a disenfranchising crime. I hereby make application for an official ballot, or ballots, to be voted by me at the election to be held in _____, on _____. Notify me of a problem with my 'Absent Elector's Ballot' at the following: Phone number: _____________________________ Email address: ____________________________ Mailing address: __________________________ I realize that I can be fined up to Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and sentenced up to five (5) years in the Penitentiary for making a false statement in this application and for selling my vote and violating the Mississippi Absentee Voter Law.  (This sentence is to be in bold print.)" SECTION 10.  Section 23-15-631, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-631.  (1)  The registrar shall enclose with each ballot mailed to an absent elector separate printed instructions furnished by the registrar containing the following: * * *  (a)  All absentee voters, excepting those with temporary or permanent physical disabilities or those who are sixty‑five (65) years of age or older, who mark their ballots in the county of the residence shall use the registrar of that county as the witness.  The absentee voter shall come to the office of the registrar and neither the registrar nor his or her deputy shall be required to go out of the registrar's office to serve as an attesting witness. ( * * *ba)  Upon receipt of the enclosed ballot, you will not mark the ballot except in view or sight of the attesting witness.  In the sight or view of the attesting witness, mark the ballot according to instructions. ( * * *cb)  After marking the ballot, fill out and sign the "ELECTOR'S CERTIFICATE" in the box on the back of the envelope so that the signature is across the flap of the envelope to ensure the integrity of the ballot.  All absent electors shall have the attesting witness sign the "ATTESTING WITNESS CERTIFICATE" in the box across the flap on the back of the envelope.  A portion of the elector's signature extending outside of the box shall not be grounds for rejecting that elector's ballot. Place the necessary postage on the envelope and deposit it in the post office or some government receptacle provided for the deposit of mail so that the absent elector's ballot will be postmarked on or before the date of the election and received by the registrar no more than five (5) business days after the election.  The ballot may only be transmitted by the United States Postal Service or other common carriers, including, but not limited to, United Parcel Service or FedEx Corporation. Any notary public, United States postmaster, assistant United States postmaster, United States postal supervisor, clerk in charge of a contract postal station, or other officer having authority to administer an oath or take an acknowledgment may be an attesting witness; provided, however, that in the case of an absent elector who is temporarily or permanently physically disabled, the attesting witness may be any person eighteen (18) years of age or older and such person is not required to have the authority to administer an oath.  If a postmaster, assistant postmaster, postal supervisor, or clerk in charge of a contract postal station acts as an attesting witness, his or her signature in a box on the elector's certificate must be authenticated by the cancellation stamp of their respective post offices.  If an officer having authority to administer an oath or take an acknowledgment acts as an attesting witness, his or her signature in a box on the elector's certificate, together with his or her title and address, but no seal, shall be required.  A portion of the elector's signature extending outside of the box shall not be grounds for rejecting that elector's ballot. Any affidavits made by an absent elector who is in the Armed Forces may be executed before a commissioned officer, warrant officer, or noncommissioned officer not lower in grade than sergeant rating or any person authorized to administer oaths. ( * * *dc)  When the application accompanies the ballot it shall not be returned in the same envelope as the ballot but shall be returned in a separate pre-addressed envelope provided by the registrar. ( * * *cd)  A candidate for public office, or the spouse, parent or child of a candidate for public office, may not be an attesting witness for any absentee ballot upon which the candidate's name appears, unless the voter is related within the first degree to the candidate or the spouse, parent or child of the candidate. ( * * *fe)  Any voter casting an absentee ballot who declares that he or she requires assistance to vote by reason of blindness, temporary or permanent physical disability or inability to read or write, shall be entitled to receive assistance in the marking of his or her absentee ballot and in completing the affidavit on the absentee ballot envelope.  The voter may be given assistance by anyone of the voter's choice other than a candidate whose name appears on the absentee ballot being marked, the spouse, parent or child of a candidate whose name appears on the absentee ballot being marked or the voter's employer, an agent of that employer or a union representative; however, a candidate whose name is on the ballot or the spouse, parent or child of such candidate may provide assistance upon request to any voter who is related within the first degree.  In order to ensure the integrity of the ballot, any person who provides assistance to an absentee voter shall be required to sign and complete the "Certificate of Person Providing Voter Assistance" on the absentee ballot envelope. (2)  The foregoing instructions required to be provided by the registrar to the elector shall also constitute the substantive law pertaining to the handling of absentee ballots by the elector and registrar. (3)  The Secretary of State shall prepare instructions on how absent voters may comply with the identification requirements of Section 23-15-563. SECTION 11.  Section 23-15-637, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-637.  (1) * * *  (a)  Absentee ballots and applications received by mail, except for fax or electronically transmitted ballots as otherwise provided by Section 23-15-699 for UOCAVA ballots, or common carrier, such as United Parcel Service or FedEx Corporation, must be * * * postmarked on or before the date of the election and received by the registrar no more than five (5) business days after the election; any received after such time shall be handled as provided in Section 23-15-647 and shall not be counted. * * *  (b)  All ballots cast by the absent elector appearing in person in the office of the registrar shall be cast with an absentee paper ballot and deposited into a sealed ballot box by the voter, not later than 12:00 noon on the Saturday immediately preceding elections held on Tuesday, the Thursday immediately preceding elections held on Saturday, or the second day immediately preceding the date of elections held on other days.  At the close of business each day at the office of the registrar, the ballot box used shall be sealed and not unsealed until the beginning of the next business day, and the seal number shall be recorded with the number of ballots cast which shall be stored in a secure location in the registrar's office. (2)  The registrar shall deposit all absentee ballots which have been timely cast and received by mail in a secured and sealed box in a designated location in the registrar's office upon receipt.  The registrar shall not send any absentee ballots to the precinct polling locations. (3)  The Secretary of State shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to ensure that when a qualified elector who is qualified to vote absentee votes by absentee mail-in ballot, * * * either by mail or in person with a regular paper ballot, that person's absentee vote is final and he or she may not vote at the polling place on election day.  Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the Secretary of State shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to ensure that absentee ballots shall remain in the registrar's office for counting and not be taken to the precincts on election day. SECTION 12.  Section 23-15-713, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-713.  For the purpose of this subarticle, any duly qualified elector may vote as provided in this subarticle if the elector falls within at least one (1) of the following categories: * * *  (a)  Any qualified elector who is a bona fide student, teacher or administrator at any college, university, junior college, high, junior high, or elementary grade school whose studies or employment at such institution necessitates his or her absence from the county of his or her voting residence on the date of any primary, general or special election, or the spouse and dependents of that student, teacher or administrator if such spouse or dependent(s) maintain a common domicile, outside of the county of his or her voting residence, with such student, teacher or administrator. ( * * *ba)  Any qualified elector who is required to be away from his or her place of residence on any election day due to his or her employment as an employee of a member of the Mississippi congressional delegation and the spouse and dependents of such person if he or she shall be residing with such absentee voter away from the county of the spouse's voting residence. * * *  (c)  Any qualified elector who is away from his or her county of residence on election day for any reason. ( * * *db)  Any person who has a temporary or permanent physical disability and who, because of such disability, is unable to vote in person without substantial hardship to himself, herself or others, or whose attendance at the voting place could reasonably cause danger to himself, herself or others. ( * * *ec)  The parent, spouse or dependent of a person with a temporary or permanent physical disability who is hospitalized outside of his or her county of residence or more than fifty (50) miles distant from his or her residence, if the parent, spouse or dependent will be with such person on election day. ( * * *fd)  Any person who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older. ( * * *ge)  Any member of the Mississippi congressional delegation absent from Mississippi on election day, and the spouse and dependents of such member of the congressional delegation. ( * * *hf)  Any qualified elector who * * * will be unable to vote in person because he or she is required to be at work on election day during the times when the polls will be open or any qualified elector who will be required to be on‑call is temporarily residing outside of their county of residence during the in-person early voting period and on election day during the times when the polls will be open. (g)  Any emergency response provider, deployed due to a state of emergency declared by the President of the United States or the governor of any state within the United States during the time period provided by state law for in-person early voting and election day. ( * * *ih)  Any qualified elector who is incarcerated in prison or jail in the county where he or she is registered to vote and has not been convicted of a disenfranchising crime. SECTION 13.  Section 23-15-715, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-715.  Any elector described in Section 23-15-713 and desiring an absentee ballot as provided in this subarticle may secure same if * * *: (a) Not more than within forty-five (45) days * * * nor later than 12:00 noon, on the Saturday immediately preceding elections held on Tuesday, the Thursday immediately preceding elections held on Saturday, or the second day immediately preceding the date of elections held on other days, he or she shall appear in person before the registrar of the county in which he resides, or for municipal elections he shall appear in person before the city clerk of the municipality in which he or she resides and, when the elector so appears, he or she shall execute and file an application as provided in Section 23‑15‑627 and vote by absentee ballot before any election, but not less than seven (7) days before the election, such elector applies for an absentee ballot as provided in the provisions of this act. * * *  If the absentee ballot has not been printed by forty‑five (45) days preceding the election, the elector may appear and file an application anytime before the election.  Then the absentee ballot shall be mailed by the registrar to the elector as soon as the ballot has been printed. (b)  Within forty‑five (45) days next prior to any election, any elector who cannot comply with paragraph (a) of this section by reason of temporarily residing outside the county, or any person who has a temporary or permanent physical disability, persons who are sixty‑five (65) years of age or older, any person who is incarcerated in prison or jail in the county where the person is registered to vote and has not been convicted of a disenfranchising crime, or any person who is the parent, spouse or dependent of a temporarily or permanently physically disabled person who is hospitalized outside of his or her county of residence or more than fifty (50) miles away from his or her residence and such parent, spouse or dependent will be with such person on election day, may make application for an absentee ballot by mailing the appropriate application to the registrar.  Only persons temporarily residing out of the county of their residence, persons having a temporary or permanent physical disability, persons who are sixty‑five (65) years of age or older, any person who is incarcerated in prison or jail in the county where the person is registered to vote and has not been convicted of a disenfranchising crime, or any person who is the parent, spouse or dependent of a temporarily or permanently physically disabled person who is hospitalized outside of his or her county of residence or more than fifty (50) miles away from his or her  residence, and such parent, spouse or dependent will be with such person on election day, may obtain absentee ballots by mail under the provisions of this subsection and as provided by Section 23‑15‑713. Applications of persons temporarily residing outside the county shall be sworn to and subscribed before an official who is authorized to administer oaths or other official authorized to witness absentee balloting as provided in this chapter, said application to be accompanied by such verifying affidavits as required by this chapter.  The  All applications, other than those of persons having a temporary or permanent physical disability, shall * * * not be sworn to and subscribed before an official who is authorized to administer oaths or another official authorized to witness absentee balloting as provided in this chapter.  The applications of persons having a temporary or permanent physical disability are not required to be accompanied by an affidavit but shall be witnessed and signed by a person eighteen (18) years of age or older.  The registrar shall send to such absent voter a proper absentee voter ballot within twenty-four (24) hours, or as soon thereafter as the ballots are available, containing the names of all candidates who qualify or the proposition to be voted on in such election, and with such ballot there shall be sent an official envelope containing upon it in printed form the recitals and data hereinafter required. * * *  (c) Except when the voter has requested a runoff ballot on the initial absentee ballot application, upon request for a runoff ballot pursuant to Section 23-15-719, the registrar shall mail together the absentee ballot application and the absentee ballot to the absent voter for the runoff election. SECTION 14.  Section 23-15-719, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-719.  (1)  Except where the registrar has already mailed a ballot with an application, upon receipt of a properly completed application form by an elector qualified to vote absentee as provided in this article, the registrar shall mail the absent voter an absentee ballot within one (1) business day, or as soon as the absentee ballot is prepared and available, containing the names of all the candidates and propositions, if any, to be voted on in the election.  The registrar shall include with the absentee ballot an official envelope that complies with the provisions of Section 23-15-635, as well as information to comply with Section 23-15-641(3) related to the status of the elector's ballot. (2)  When an absentee voter appears before the registrar to vote, the registrar shall identify the applicant by requiring him or her to present identification as required by Section 23-15-563, and shall then deliver the ballot to the applicant in the registrar's office.  After the applicant has properly marked the ballot and properly folded it, he or she shall deposit it in the envelope furnished to him or her by the registrar. After the absentee voter has sealed the envelope as provided in Section 23-15-635, he or she shall ensure the absentee application on the front of the envelope is complete and shall subscribe and swear to an affidavit.  The affidavit shall be in the following form, which shall be printed on the back of the envelope containing the applicant's ballot: "STATE OF MISSISSIPPI COUNTY OF ___________ I, __________, do solemnly swear that this envelope contains the ballot marked by me indicating my choice of the candidates or propositions to be submitted at the election to be held on the ___ day of __________, 2___, and I hereby authorize the registrar to place this envelope in the ballot box on my behalf, and I further authorize the resolution board to open this envelope and place my ballot among the other ballots cast before such ballots are counted, and record my name on the poll list as if I were present in person and voted. I further swear that I marked the enclosed ballot in secret. _______________________ (Signature of voter) SWORN TO AND SUBSCRIBED before me, __________, this the ___ day of __________, 2___. (Registrar) _______________________ (Registrar)" After the completion of the requirements of this section, the elector shall deliver the envelope containing the ballot to the registrar. (3)  If the voter has received assistance in marking his or her ballot, the person providing the assistance shall complete the following form which shall be printed on the back of the envelope containing the applicant's ballot: "CERTIFICATE OF PERSON PROVIDING VOTER ASSISTANCE (To be completed only if the voter has received assistance in marking the enclosed ballot.)  I hereby certify that the above-named voter declared to me that he or she is blind, temporarily or permanently physically disabled, or cannot read or write, and that the voter requested that I assist the voter in marking the enclosed absentee ballot.  I hereby certify that the ballot preferences on the enclosed ballot are those communicated by the voter to me, and that I have marked the enclosed ballot in accordance with the voter's instructions. ___________________________________________ Signature of person providing assistance ___________________________________________ Printed name of person providing assistance ___________________________________________ Address of person providing assistance ___________________________________________ Date and time assistance provided ___________________________________________ Family relationship to voter (if any)" (4)  The envelope used pursuant to this section shall not contain the form prescribed by Section 23-15-635 and shall have printed on the flap on the back of the envelope in bold print and in a distinguishing color, the following:  "YOUR VOTE WILL BE REJECTED AND NOT COUNTED IF THIS ENVELOPE IS NOT SIGNED BY YOU AND AN ATTESTING WITNESS IN THE BOXES ACROSS THE FLAP OF THIS ENVELOPE." A portion of the voter's signature extending outside of the box shall not be grounds for rejecting that voter's ballot. (5)  The registrar shall not personally hand deliver ballots to voters, except to those who personally appear in the registrar's office to absentee vote. (6)  Ballots requested under Section 23-15-713(f) shall be mailed to the voter's address outside of the county in which he or she is registered. SECTION 15.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after January 1, 2027.